Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2055.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5144XS (5) 91 as/js S.F. 2055 Section 1. SUPREME COURT ââ RULES OF CRIMINAL PROCEDURE 1 REVISIONS. 2 1. The supreme court shall revise Iowa rule of criminal 3 procedure 2.22(8)(e)(1) to provide that, at a hearing to 4 determine whether a defendant continues to be mentally ill and 5 dangerous to the defendantâs self or others, the absence of 6 recent overt acts of dangerousness shall not, by itself, be 7 the sole determining factor in assessing whether the defendant 8 poses a risk to the defendantâs self or others, particularly 9 when such absence may be attributable to the constraints of a 10 highly structured environment. In making its determination, 11 the court shall, in addition to other evidence presented, 12 consider a variety of relevant factors, including but not 13 limited to all of the following: 14 a. Original offense. The nature and circumstances of the 15 original charge or offense leading to the defendantâs insanity 16 acquittal. 17 b. Behavioral history. The defendantâs past conduct, 18 including prior violent or dangerous acts, irrespective of the 19 presence or absence of recent overt acts. 20 c. Psychiatric history and current mental status. The 21 defendantâs current psychiatric condition, history of 22 treatment, adherence to treatment, and responsiveness to 23 interventions. 24 d. Substance use disorder history. The defendantâs 25 history of substance use and its impact on the defendantâs 26 behavior, including prior diagnoses of substance use disorder, 27 the relationship between substance use and prior violent or 28 dangerous conduct, the likelihood of relapse and its potential 29 to increase dangerousness, and the defendantâs access to and 30 willingness to engage in substance use treatment programs to 31 maintain safety. 32 e. Institutional behavior and independent functioning. 33 The defendantâs ability and willingness to engage in social, 34 recreational, educational, occupational, or vocational 35 -1- LSB 5144XS (5) 91 as/js 1/ 3 S.F. 2055 activities; maintain self-care; demonstrate stability, 1 adaptability, and reduced risk of dangerousness in less 2 structured environments; seek and utilize support systems; 3 and comply with rules and interact appropriately within a 4 structured environment, including any incidents indicating 5 underlying dangerousness. 6 f. Environmental influences. The extent to which a highly 7 structured setting, such as a hospital or secured facility, 8 may suppress behaviors that are likely to manifest in less 9 controlled or structured conditions. 10 g. Expert testimony and risk assessment reports. 11 Evaluations and risk assessments provided by qualified mental 12 health professionals regarding the defendantâs potential danger 13 to themselves or others. This includes consideration of 14 validated risk assessment tools and methodologies, including 15 any limitations in assessing an individual confined to a 16 structured setting. 17 2. The revised rules of criminal procedure shall be 18 submitted for legislative council review no later than October 19 14, 2026. 20